Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,188.02
Failure to maintain investment and employment level; effect.

If the taxpayer does not maintain the increases in the level of investment and employment described in subsection (1) of section 77-27,188 to create a credit for at least three years after the year for which the credit was first allowed, the taxpayer shall lose all used and unused credits. The taxpayer shall repay to the state the amount of the used credits within one year after the failure to maintain such investment and employment.

Laws 1987, LB 270, § 4;

Laws 1989, LB 335, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 886, § 4;

Laws 2001, LB 169, § 3;

Laws 2003, LB 608, § 6;

Laws 2006, LB 990, § 5.